Oklahoma, session 2025, SB843.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 5-113, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 5-113. A. Except as otherwise provided in this


section, no person shall be eligible to be a candidate for or serve


on a board of education if the person is currently employed by the


school district governed by that board of education or is related


within the second degree by affinity or consanguinity to any other


member of the board of education or to any employee of the school


district governed by the board of education. The purpose of this


section is both to prohibit persons who are related within the


second degree by affinity or consanguinity from serving


simultaneously on the same board of education of any school district

Req. No. 151 Page 1


of this state and to prohibit persons who are related within the


second degree of consanguinity or affinity to an employee of a


school district from serving on the board of education governing the


school district while such relative is employed except as otherwise


provided in this section.


B. If the relationship is based on affinity, the prohibitions


in this section shall not apply to prevent members of boards of


education who are serving on September 1, 1995, from serving the


term for which they were elected or from serving successive terms


for which they may be elected, unless it is the member’s spouse who


is a member of the board of education or an employee of the school


district,; then such prohibitions shall apply.


C. The prohibitions set forth in this section shall not apply


if:


1. The person related to the board member within the second


degree of affinity or consanguinity is employed as a substitute


teacher by the school district pursuant to the provisions of Section


6-105 of this title or as a temporary substitute support employee if


the school district has an Average Daily Membership average daily


membership (ADM) of less than five thousand (5,000); or


2. The school district has an ADM of less than four hundred


(400) five hundred fifty (550), the board of education has adopted a


policy providing for such candidate eligibility and the board member


who is related within the second degree by affinity or consanguinity

Req. No. 151 Page 2


to any employee of the school district governed by the board of


education complies with the provisions of subsection E of Section 5-


113.1 of this title.


D. Any member of a board of education who violates the


provisions of this section shall be subject to the penalties


prescribed by Sections 485 and 486 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 5-113.1, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 5-113.1. A. Except as otherwise provided in this


section, no person may be employed or put under contract by a school


district if that person is related to a member of the board of


education of that school district within the second degree of


consanguinity or affinity. A teacher or employee already under


contract to or otherwise employed by the school district at the time


the relationship is established may continue in said such


employment. Except as otherwise provided, a board member already


serving at the time the relationship is established may serve out


the term for which the member was elected but shall not be eligible


to be a candidate for or serve successive terms of office for which


the member may be elected.


B. The provisions of this section shall not prevent a board


member from serving successive terms of office if otherwise eligible


under the provision of Section 5-113 of this title. No member of

Req. No. 151 Page 3


the board of education who has resigned from the board before the


term of the person has expired may be reappointed to the board to


complete the remainder of the term if a teacher or employee related


to the resigned member of the board within the second degree of


consanguinity or affinity was put under contract or otherwise


employed by the school district after the board member resigned.


C. The provisions of this section shall not prevent a person


who is related to a member of the board of education within the


second degree of consanguinity or affinity from being employed by


the school district as a substitute teacher pursuant to the


provisions of Section 6-105 of this title or as a temporary


substitute support employee if the school district has an Average


Daily Membership average daily membership (ADM) of less than five


thousand (5,000).


D. The provisions of this section shall not prevent a person


who is related to a member of the board of education within the


second degree of consanguinity or affinity from being employed by


the school district if the school district has an Average Daily


Membership average daily membership (ADM) of less than four hundred


(400) five hundred fifty (550) and the board of education has


adopted a policy providing for such employment.


E. Any member of a board of education who is related to a


teacher or other employee of the district within the second degree


of consanguinity or affinity shall not attend or participate in any

Req. No. 151 Page 4


regular or executive session of the board held to consider any


personnel matter or litigation relating to said such teacher or


employee. The member may vote on collective bargaining agreements


or the renewal of contracts as a group if the vote is necessary to


form a quorum of the board of education members. If more than one


member of the board of education is related to a teacher or


employee, only the minimum number of those members which is


necessary to form a quorum shall be allowed to vote. Each board of


education so affected shall adopt a written policy establishing


procedures on when such a member may vote on the renewal of


contracts or collective bargaining agreements.


F. Any member of a board of education who violates the


provisions of this section shall be subject to the penalties


prescribed by Sections 485 and 486 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-151 EB 1/19/2025 5:44:29 AM





Req. No. 151 Page 5